Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2308
Collaboration, defined.

Collaboration means a process and relationship in which a nurse practitioner, together with other health professionals, delivers health care within the scope of authority of the various clinical specialty practices.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 13;

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 18;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 36;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 52;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1716;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 800.